Hawaii statutes.
§481L-2 Disclosures. A retail lessor
shall:

(1) Disclose in the lease agreement provided to the
lessee, in a clear and conspicuous manner, any and all material terms,
conditions, and limitations that apply to the lease agreement, including but
not limited to the consumer lease disclosures required by the federal Truth in
Lending Act and rules adopted under that Act;

(2) Disclose to the retail lessee in the lease
agreement in a separate blocked section, in capital letters of at least
ten-point bold type, as follows:

THIS IS A LEASE AGREEMENT. THIS IS NOT A
PURCHASE AGREEMENT. PLEASE REVIEW THESE MATTERS CAREFULLY AND SEEK INDEPENDENT
PROFESSIONAL ADVICE IF YOU HAVE ANY QUESTIONS CONCERNING THIS TRANSACTION. YOU
ARE ENTITLED TO AN EXACT COPY OF THE AGREEMENT YOU SIGN. GET ALL PROMISES IN
WRITING. ORAL PROMISES ARE DIFFICULT TO ENFORCE. IF YOU REQUEST IT, YOU CAN
RECEIVE A COPY OF YOUR LESSOR'S LEASE CALCULATION WORKSHEET BEFORE YOU SIGN OR
WITHIN SIX MONTHS AFTER SIGNING. YOU CAN ALSO RECEIVE UPON REQUEST A COPY OF
ANY OF THE DOCUMENTS YOU REVIEWED DURING THE LEASE TRANSACTION.;

(3) Disclose to the retail lessee in the lease
agreement in capital letters of at least ten-point bold type, with the
appropriate amounts specified, the following:

(A) THE GROSS CAPITALIZED COST
$____________________

(B) THE CAPITALIZED COST REDUCTION
$________________

(C) THE ADJUSTED CAPITALIZED COST
$_________________;

(4) Provide the retail lessee with a copy of each
document that is signed by the retail lessee during the course of the lease
transaction and any document that is referenced or incorporated into the lease
agreement. Also, provide the retail lessee with a copy of each document
requested by the retail lessee that is presented during the course of the lease
transaction;

(5) Prepare all disclosures made pursuant to this
section and section 481L-3 and all documents executed in a lease transaction in
the language principally used in negotiating the lease transaction; and

(6) Upon request by the retail lessee at any time
during the lease transaction and at any time during the first six months of the
term of the lease agreement, provide to the retail lessee at no cost to the
retail lessee a copy of the retail lessor's worksheets used to calculate the periodic
lease payment. Worksheets that are stored on computer media shall be reduced
to printed form for the lessee. The worksheets shall be maintained by the
retail lessor or its agents during the first six months of the term of the
lease agreement. The retail lessor shall not be required to provide those
portions of any worksheets that contain dealer markup information or lease
assignment settlement amounts. [L 1997, c 82, pt of §1; am L 1998, c 201, §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next